Oklahoma, session 2025, SB710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-116.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3-116.2. A. Effective January 1, 2013, there is hereby


created the Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability,


which shall be known as the Commission for Education Impact


effective November 1, 2025. The membership of the Commission shall


consist of:


1. The Secretary of Education, who shall serve as the chair of


the Commission;



Req. No. 1245 Page 1


2. One member appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, representing business and industry from an


Oklahoma employer with five hundred (500) or fewer employees;


3. One member, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, who is a parent of a child enrolled in a


public school in this state;


4. One member, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, who is an administrator of a public school


district;


5. One member, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, who shall represent higher education teacher


education programs;


6. One member appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, who shall be an active classroom teacher in


kindergarten through grade six; and


7. One member appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, who shall be an active classroom teacher in


grades seven through twelve.


The terms of the initial appointed members shall commence on


January 1, 2013, and shall end on June 30, 2014. The Effective


November 1, 2025, the terms of subsequently the six appointed


members shall commence on July 1 of each year following the election


of the Governor thereafter and shall be for staggered. The terms of


members appointed after the effective date of this act shall

Req. No. 1245 Page 2


commence on July 1, 2027. The terms of two members shall end on


June 30, 2029, on June 30, 2030, and on June 30, 2031. The terms of


subsequently appointed members shall be four (4) years. If a


vacancy occurs, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term


in the same manner as the office was previously filled.


B. A quorum of the Commission, which shall consist of four


members, shall be present in order for the Commission to transact


any business. Members shall be reimbursed for travel in the


performance of their official duties in accordance with the State


Travel Reimbursement Act.


C. Prior to July 1, 2013, the Commission shall meet to organize


and plan for the assumption of the powers and duties of the


Education Oversight Board and the Oklahoma Commission for Teacher


Preparation.


D. Beginning July 1, 2013, the Commission shall assume the


following duties:


1. Oversee implementation of the provisions of Enrolled House


Bill No. 1017 of the 1st Extraordinary Session of the 42nd Oklahoma


Legislature;


2. Implementation of the provisions of the Oklahoma Teacher


Preparation Act as provided for in law;


3. Make recommendations to the Governor and Legislature on


methods to achieve an aligned, seamless system from preschool


through postsecondary education; and

Req. No. 1245 Page 3


4. Set performance levels and corresponding cut scores pursuant


to the Oklahoma School Testing Program Act and as provided for in


Section 1210.541 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.


E. Beginning July 1, 2013, the Commission shall govern the


operation of the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability


ImpactEd created in Section 3-117 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title.


F. 1. Beginning July 1, 2014, the Commission shall assume the


following duties of the Oklahoma Commission for Teacher Preparation


according to the provisions of the Oklahoma Teacher Preparation Act:


a. approval and accreditation of teacher education


programs, and


b. assessment of candidates for licensure and


certification.


2. To implement the provisions of this subsection the


Commission shall:


a. include the State Board of Education in the process,


b. review and assess approved, accredited, and new


programs of teacher education, and


c. encourage studies and research designed to improve


teacher education.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-116.3, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 1245 Page 4


Section 3-116.3. A. As of July 1, 2013 November 1, 2025, all


references to the Education Oversight Board shall mean the


Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability Education


Impact.


B. As of July 1, 2013 November 1, 2025, all references to the


Office of Accountability shall mean the Office of Educational


Quality and Accountability ImpactEd.


C. As of July 1, 2014 November 1, 2025, all references to the


Oklahoma Commission for Teacher Preparation shall mean the


Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability Education


Impact.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1245 EB 1/19/2025 5:41:48 AM





















Req. No. 1245 Page 5